Utah statutes.
63G-7-704.   Tax levy by political subdivisions for payment of claims, judgments, or insurance premiums.

(1)  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a political subdivision may levy an annual property tax sufficient to pay:

(a)  any claim, settlement, or judgment;

(b)  the costs to defend against any claim, settlement, or judgment; or

(c)  for the establishment and maintenance of a reserve fund for the payment of claims, settlements, or judgments that may be reasonably anticipated.

(2) (a)  The payments authorized to pay for punitive damages or to pay the premium for authorized insurance is money spent for a public purpose within the meaning of this section and Article XIII, Sec. 5, Utah Constitution, even though, as a result of the levy, the maximum levy as otherwise restricted by law is exceeded.

(b)  No levy under this section may exceed .0001 per dollar of taxable value of taxable property.

(c)  The revenues derived from this levy may not be used for any purpose other than those specified in this section.

